Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1001
Legislative intent.

The Legislature finds and declares that there is a vital need for increased training and research activity in the fields of traffic safety, domestic safety, industrial safety, fire safety, and recreational safety and that this activity can best be achieved by utilizing the facilities of an institution of higher education.

The Legislature further declares and assents to the establishment and administration of the Nebraska Safety Center at the University of Nebraska at Kearney.

Laws 1978, LB 693, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 28.